Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 243.650
to 243.806.
SECTION 2. (1) For purposes of an arbitration proceeding under ORS 243.706 concerning
alleged misconduct by a law enforcement officer:
(a) A law enforcement agency or, if  applicable, a civilian or community oversight board,
agency or review body, has the burden of proof  by a preponderance of the evidence to show
that:
(A) The officer engaged in the alleged misconduct; and
(B) Any disciplinary action taken against the officer was with just cause, as  defined in
ORS 236.350.
(b) In determining the reasonableness of a disciplinary  action imposed by a law enforce-
ment agency or a civilian or community oversight board, agency  or review body, including
whether the level of discipline is appropriate, an arbitrator shall uphold the disciplinary
action unless the arbitrator finds that the disciplinary action is arbitrary and capricious.
(c) When the imposed disciplinary action is termination of  employment, an arbitrator
may not set aside or reduce the imposed disciplinary action if setting aside or reducing  the
disciplinary action is inconsistent with  the public interest in maintaining community trust,
enforcing a higher standard of conduct for  law enforcement officers and ensuring an ac-
countable, fair and just disciplinary process.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 243.706 (1), and subject to paragraph  (b) of this subsection,
in carrying out an arbitration  proceeding described under ORS 243.706 (3), the Employment
Relations Board shall appoint a person from a list of qualified,  indifferent and unbiased per-
sons to serve as the  arbitrator of the proceeding. The board shall submit to each of the
parties subject to the proceeding the list of persons who may serve as arbitrators.
(b) After the board has  selected a person from the list to serve as the arbitrator of the
proceeding, each  of the parties subject to the proceeding is entitled to one opportunity to
object to the board’s proposed arbitrator. If a party  objects to the proposed arbitrator, the
board shall select an alternative person to  serve as the arbitrator. If the other party objects
to the  alternative person, the board shall make a final selection from the names remaining
on the list as to who shall serve as the arbitrator of the proceeding.
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 1
(3) The requirements described in this section are not subject to collective bargaining.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Civilian or  community oversight board, agency or review body” means a board, an
agency or a body:
(A) Designated by a  municipality or a law enforcement agency in performing duties re-
lated to investigating  allegations of officer misconduct or reviewing police policies and prac-
tices; or
(B) Created to  oversee disciplinary matters concerning law enforcement officers pursu-
ant to a city charter or ordinance for  which a measure that included the question of whether
to establish the board, agency or body was referred to and approved by the people of the  city
at an election held on or after July 1, 2020.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” and “law enforcement officer” have  the meanings given
those terms in ORS 131.930.
SECTION 3.
(1) For matters concerning alleged misconduct by a law  enforcement officer,
the following shall make determinations regarding the alleged misconduct and impose disci-
plinary action in response to such determinations in accordance with the uniform  standards
adopted by the Commission on Statewide Law Enforcement Standards of Conduct and Disci-
pline under section 4 of this 2021 Act:
(a) A law enforcement agency located anywhere in this state.
(b) An arbitrator who  serves in an arbitration proceeding described under ORS 243.706
(3).
(c) A civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body.
(2) The requirements described in this section are not subject to collective bargaining.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Civilian or  community oversight board, agency or review body” means a board, an
agency or a body:
(A) Designated by a  municipality or a law enforcement agency in performing duties re-
lated to investigating  allegations of officer misconduct or reviewing police policies and prac-
tices; or
(B) Created to  oversee disciplinary matters concerning law enforcement officers pursu-
ant to a city charter or ordinance for  which a measure that included the question of whether
to establish the board, agency or body was referred to and approved by the people of the  city
at an election held on or after July 1, 2020.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” and “law enforcement officer” have  the meanings given
those terms in ORS 131.930.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Commission on Statewide Law Enforcement Standards of Conduct
and Discipline is established for the purpose of adopting rules that prescribe uniform:
(a) Standards of conduct, including guidelines and procedures, to which law  enforcement
officers shall adhere; and
(b) Disciplinary standards  and procedures, including a range of disciplinary actions that
may include consideration  of aggravating or mitigating circumstances, by which a law
enforcement agency,  a civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body, and
an arbitrator who serves in an arbitration proceeding described under ORS 243.706  (3) shall
make determinations regarding alleged misconduct by  a law enforcement officer, and shall
make recommendations  for and impose disciplinary action in response to such determi-
nations.
(2) The commission consists of 15 members as follows:
(a) The Director  of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training or a designee
from the department.
(b) The Attorney General or a designee from the Attorney General’s office.
(c) The President of the Senate shall  appoint one nonvoting member, acting in an advi-
sory capacity only, from among members of the Senate.
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 2
(d) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one  nonvoting member,
acting in an advisory capacity only, from among members of the House of Representatives.
(e) The Director  of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training and the At-
torney General shall jointly appoint 11 members of the  commission consistent with the fol-
lowing:
(A) Two members who are chief law enforcement officers.
(B) Two members who represent labor organizations  who represent law enforcement of-
ficers.
(C) Two members who represent historically marginalized  groups or community-based
organizations that represent communities impacted by policing.
(D) One member who represents a federally recognized Indian tribe or association  of
tribes within this state.
(E) Two members who are representatives of local  government to represent the interests
of cities and counties.
(F) One  member who represents public defender organizations established under ORS
chapter 151 or the Oregon Criminal Defense Lawyers Association.
(G) One member who represents the interests of prosecutors in this state.
(3) At a minimum,  the uniform standards described under subsection (1) of this section
must address standards of conduct and discipline regarding:
(a) Unjustified or excessive use of physical or deadly force;
(b) Sexual harassment;
(c) Sexual assault;
(d) Assault;
(e) Conduct that is motivated by or based on a real or  perceived factor of an individual’s
race, ethnicity, national origin, sex,  gender identity, sexual orientation, religion or
homelessness;
(f) Moral character; and
(g) The use of drugs or alcohol while on duty.
(4) On or before October 1, 2022, the commission shall adopt  and publish rules pursuant
to ORS chapter 183 to establish the  uniform standards described under subsection (1) of this
section.
(5) The commission shall review the standards described under subsection  (1) of this
section at least once every two years.
(6) The meetings of the commission  shall be open to the public in accordance with state
law. Records of the commission shall be open and available to the public  in accordance with
state law.
(7) The commission  shall establish and implement an open hearing process for public in-
put and deliberation before  the commission adopts rules that establish the standards de-
scribed under subsection (1) of this section, including:
(a) Public notice;
(b) Public outreach to solicit broad public participation; and
(c) Public hearings to receive public comment.
(8) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a  quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(9) Official action by the commission requires the approval of a majority  of the commis-
sion.
(10) The term of a member appointed under subsection (2)(e) of this section shall be  two
years. If there is a  vacancy on the commission for any reason, the Director of the Depart-
ment of Public Safety  Standards and Training and the Attorney General shall appoint a
person to the unexpired term.
(11) The members of the commission  shall elect one person from the Department of
Public Safety Standards and Training and one person from the Department  of Justice from
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 3
among the members of  the commission to serve as cochairpersons of the commission who
shall preside over meetings  and execute the duties determined by the commission to be
necessary.
(12) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission.
(13) A member of the commission  who is not a member of the Legislative Assembly is
entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(14)(a) The commission shall prepare and submit a report  in the manner provided by ORS
192.245 to the  House Committee on Judiciary or an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary no later than September 1, 2022, and September  1 every
year thereafter.
(b) The initial report must describe the development  and adoption of the uniform stand-
ards described under subsection (1) of this section, including the methodology used to apprise
each law enforcement agency in this state and each civilian or community oversight board,
agency or review body, of the standards. The  commission shall include in reports submitted
after September 1, 2022, information regarding the progress  of each law enforcement agency
and civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body, towards implementing and
applying the uniform standards  and the commission’s recommendations on updates to the
standards, as are considered necessary.
(15) As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.115.
(b) “Civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body” means a  board, an
agency or a body:
(A) Designated by a municipality or a law enforcement agency in  performing duties re-
lated to investigating allegations of officer misconduct or reviewing police policies  and prac-
tices; or
(B) Created to oversee disciplinary matters concerning law enforcement  officers pursu-
ant to a city charter or ordinance for  which a measure that included the question of whether
to establish the board, agency or body was referred to and approved by the people of the  city
at an election held on or after July 1, 2020.
(c) “Law enforcement  agency” and “law enforcement officer” have the meanings given
those terms in ORS 131.930.
(d) “Sexual assault” has the meaning given that term in ORS 243.317.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 243.650, as amended by section 2, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special
session), is amended to read:
243.650. As used in ORS 243.650 to 243.806, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Appropriate  bargaining unit” means the unit designated by the Employment Relations Board
or voluntarily recognized by  the public employer to be appropriate for collective bargaining. How-
ever, an appropriate bargaining unit may not  include both academically licensed and unlicensed or
nonacademically licensed school employees. Academically licensed units may include  but are not
limited to teachers,  nurses, counselors, therapists, psychologists, child development specialists and
similar positions. This limitation does not apply to any  bargaining unit certified or recognized prior
to June 6, 1995, or to any school district with fewer than 50 employees.
(2) “Board” means the Employment Relations Board.
(3) “Certification” means official recognition by the board that a labor organization  is the ex-
clusive representative for all of the employees in the appropriate bargaining unit.
(4) “Collective bargaining” means the performance of the mutual obligation  of a public employer
and the representative of its employees to meet at reasonable  times and confer in good faith with
respect  to  employment relations for the purpose of negotiations concerning mandatory subjects of
bargaining, to meet and confer in  good faith in accordance with law with respect to any dispute
concerning the interpretation or application of a collective bargaining  agreement, and to execute
written contracts incorporating agreements that have been reached on  behalf of the public employer
and the employees in the bargaining unit covered by such negotiations. The obligation to  meet and
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 4
negotiate does not compel either party to agree to a  proposal or require the making of a concession.
This subsection  may not be construed to prohibit a public employer and a certified or recognized
representative  of  its employees from discussing or executing written agreements regarding matters
other than mandatory  subjects of bargaining that are not prohibited by law as long as there is mu-
tual agreement of the parties to discuss these matters, which are permissive  subjects of bargaining.
(5) “Compulsory arbitration” means the procedure whereby parties  involved in a labor dispute
are required by law to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
(6) “Confidential employee” means one who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to a per-
son who formulates, determines and effectuates management policies in the  area of collective bar-
gaining.
(7)(a) “Employment relations” includes, but is not  limited to, matters concerning direct or indi-
rect monetary benefits, hours, vacations, sick leave,  labor organization access to and communication
with represented employees, grievance procedures and other conditions of employment.
(b) “Employment relations” does not include subjects  determined to be permissive, nonmanda-
tory subjects of bargaining by the Employment Relations Board prior to June 6, 1995.
(c) After June 6,  1995, “employment relations” does not include subjects that the Employment
Relations Board determines to have a greater  impact on management’s prerogative than on em-
ployee wages, hours, or other terms and conditions of employment.
(d) “Employment relations” does not include subjects that have an insubstantial  or de minimis
effect on public employee wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment.
(e) For school district  bargaining, “employment relations” excludes class size, the school or ed-
ucational calendar, standards of  performance or criteria for evaluation of teachers, the school cur-
riculum, reasonable dress, grooming and at-work personal conduct requirements respecting smoking,
gum chewing and similar matters of personal conduct, the standards and procedures for student
discipline, the time between student  classes, the selection, agendas and decisions of 21st Century
Schools Councils established under ORS 329.704, requirements for expressing milk under  ORS
653.077, and any  other subject proposed that is permissive under paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this
subsection.
(f) For employee bargaining involving employees covered by ORS 243.736 and  employees of the
Department of Corrections who have direct contact with adults in  custody, “employment relations”
includes safety issues  that have an impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees or staffing levels
that have a significant impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees.
[(g) For  employee bargaining involving sworn law enforcement officers of a law enforcement
agency, as those terms  are defined in ORS 131.930, “employment relations” includes the development
of a discipline guide or discipline matrix as those terms are defined in ORS 243.706. ]
[(h)] (g) For all other  employee bargaining except school district bargaining and except as pro-
vided in paragraph (f) of this subsection, “employment relations” excludes staffing levels and safety
issues (except those staffing levels  and safety issues that have a direct and substantial effect on the
on-the-job safety of public employees), scheduling  of services provided to the public, determination
of the minimum qualifications necessary  for any position, criteria for evaluation or performance
appraisal, assignment of duties, workload when the  effect on duties is insubstantial, reasonable
dress, grooming, and at-work personal conduct  requirements respecting smoking, gum chewing, and
similar matters of personal conduct at work, and any  other subject proposed that is permissive un-
der paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(8) “Exclusive representative” means  the labor organization that, as a result of certification by
the board or recognition by the employer, has the right to be the collective bargaining agent of  all
employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.
(9) “Fact-finding” means identification  of the major issues in a particular labor dispute by one
or more impartial individuals who review the positions  of the parties, resolve factual differences and
make recommendations for settlement of the dispute.
(10) “Fair-share agreement” means  an agreement between the public employer and the recog-
nized or certified bargaining representative of public employees whereby employees who  are not
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 5
members of the  employee organization are required to make an in-lieu-of-dues payment to an em-
ployee organization except as provided in ORS 243.666. Upon the filing with the board  of a petition
by 30 percent  or more of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit covered by such union
security agreement declaring they desire  that the agreement be rescinded, the board shall take a
secret ballot of the employees in the unit and certify the results thereof to the  recognized or certi-
fied bargaining representative and to the public employer. Unless  a majority of the votes cast in an
election favor the union security agreement, the board shall certify deauthorization of  the agree-
ment. A petition  for deauthorization of a union security agreement must be filed not more than 90
calendar days after the collective bargaining agreement is  executed. Only one such election may be
conducted in any appropriate bargaining unit  during the term of a collective bargaining agreement
between a public employer and the recognized or certified bargaining representative.
(11) “Final offer”  means the proposed contract language and cost summary submitted to the
mediator within seven days of the declaration of impasse.
(12) “Labor  dispute” means any controversy concerning employment relations or concerning the
association or representation of persons  in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to
arrange terms or conditions of employment relations, regardless of  whether the disputants stand in
the proximate relation of employer and employee.
(13) “Labor  organization” means any organization that has as one of its purposes representing
employees in their employment relations with public employers.
(14) “Last best offer package” means the offer exchanged by parties not  less than 14 days prior
to the date scheduled for an interest arbitration hearing.
(15) “Legislative body” means the Legislative Assembly, the city council, the  county commission
and any other board or commission empowered to levy taxes.
(16) “Managerial employee” means an employee of the State of Oregon or  a public university
listed in ORS 352.002  who possesses authority to formulate and carry out management decisions or
who represents management’s interest by taking or effectively recommending  discretionary actions
that control or implement employer policy, and who has discretion in  the performance of these
management responsibilities beyond the routine discharge of duties.  A “managerial employee” need
not act in a supervisory capacity in relation to other employees. Notwithstanding  this subsection,
“managerial employee” does not include faculty members at a community college, college or uni-
versity.
(17) “Mediation” means assistance by an impartial third  party in reconciling a labor dispute
between the public employer and the exclusive representative regarding employment relations.
(18) “Payment-in-lieu-of-dues” means an assessment to defray the cost for services by  the exclu-
sive representative  in negotiations and contract administration of all persons in an appropriate
bargaining unit who are not members of the organization serving as exclusive  representative of the
employees. The payment must be equivalent to  regular union dues and assessments, if any, or must
be an amount  agreed upon by the public employer and the exclusive representative of the employees.
(19) “Public employee” means  an employee of a public employer but does not include elected
officials, persons appointed to serve on boards or commissions, incarcerated persons working under
Article I, section 41, of  the Oregon Constitution, or persons who are confidential employees, super-
visory employees or managerial employees.
(20) “Public employer”  means the State of Oregon, and the following political subdivisions:
Cities, counties,  community colleges, school districts, special districts, mass transit districts, metro-
politan service districts, public service  corporations or municipal corporations and public and
quasi-public corporations.
(21) “Public employer representative” includes  any individual or individuals specifically desig-
nated by the public employer to act in its interests in all matters dealing with employee represen-
tation, collective bargaining and related issues.
(22) “Strike” means a public employee’s refusal in concerted action with others to  report for
duty, or  his or her willful absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage of work, or his
or her absence in whole or in part from the full, faithful or  proper performance of his or her duties
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 6
of employment, for the purpose of inducing, influencing or  coercing a change in the conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges or obligations of public employment; however, nothing  shall limit
or impair the right  of any public employee to lawfully express or communicate a complaint or
opinion on any matter related to the conditions of employment.
(23)(a) “Supervisory employee” means any individual having authority in the interest of  the
employer to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign,  reward or discipline
other employees, or responsibly to  direct them, or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to re-
commend such action, if in connection therewith, the exercise of the authority is not of a  merely
routine or clerical nature but requires  the use of independent judgment. Failure to assert supervi-
sory status  in any Employment Relations Board proceeding or in negotiations for any collective
bargaining agreement does not thereafter prevent assertion of supervisory status  in any subsequent
board proceeding or contract negotiation.
(b) “Supervisory employee” includes a faculty member of a public university listed in  ORS
352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University who:
(A) Is employed  as a president, vice president, provost, vice provost, dean, associate dean, as-
sistant dean, head or equivalent position; or
(B) Is employed in an administrative position without a reasonable expectation of  teaching, re-
search or other scholarly accomplishments.
(c) “Supervisory employee” does not include:
(A) A nurse, charge nurse or  nurse holding a similar position if that position has not tradi-
tionally been classified as supervisory;
(B) A firefighter prohibited from striking  by ORS 243.736 who assigns, transfers or directs the
work of other employees but does not have  the authority to hire, discharge or impose economic
discipline on those employees;
(C) A faculty member of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon  Health and
Science University who is not a faculty member described in paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
(D) An employee of the Oregon State Police who:
(i) Serves in a rank equivalent to or below the rank of sergeant;
(ii) Is prohibited from striking by ORS 243.736; and
(iii) Assigns, transfers or directs the work of other employees but does not hire, discharge  or
impose economic discipline on those employees.
(24) “Unfair labor  practice” means the commission of an act designated an unfair labor practice
in ORS 243.672.
(25) “Voluntary  arbitration” means the procedure whereby parties involved in a labor dispute
mutually agree to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 243.650, as amended by section  2, chapter 146, Oregon Laws 2019, and section
3, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session), is amended to read:
243.650. As used in ORS 243.650 to 243.806, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Appropriate  bargaining unit” means the unit designated by the Employment Relations Board
or voluntarily recognized by the public employer to be appropriate for collective  bargaining. How-
ever, an appropriate bargaining unit may not include  both academically licensed and unlicensed or
nonacademically licensed school employees.  Academically licensed units may include but are not
limited to teachers, nurses, counselors, therapists, psychologists, child development  specialists and
similar positions. This limitation does not apply to any  bargaining unit certified or recognized prior
to June 6, 1995, or to any school district with fewer than 50 employees.
(2) “Board” means the Employment Relations Board.
(3) “Certification” means official  recognition by the board that a labor organization is the ex-
clusive representative for all of the employees in the appropriate bargaining unit.
(4) “Collective bargaining” means the performance of the mutual obligation  of a public employer
and the representative of its employees to meet  at reasonable times and confer in good faith with
respect to employment relations for the purpose of negotiations concerning mandatory subjects  of
bargaining, to meet and confer in good faith in accordance with law  with respect to any dispute
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 7
concerning the interpretation or application  of a collective bargaining agreement, and to execute
written contracts incorporating agreements that have been reached on  behalf of the public employer
and the employees  in the bargaining unit covered by such negotiations. The obligation to meet and
negotiate does not compel either party to agree to a  proposal or require the making of a concession.
This subsection  may not be construed to prohibit a public employer and a certified or recognized
representative  of  its employees from discussing or executing written agreements regarding matters
other than mandatory  subjects of bargaining that are not prohibited by law as long as there is mu-
tual agreement of the parties to discuss these matters, which are permissive  subjects of bargaining.
(5) “Compulsory arbitration” means the procedure whereby parties  involved in a labor dispute
are required by law to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
(6) “Confidential employee” means one who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to a per-
son who formulates, determines and effectuates management policies in the  area of collective bar-
gaining.
(7)(a) “Employment relations” includes, but is not  limited to, matters concerning direct or indi-
rect monetary benefits, hours, vacations, sick leave,  labor organization access to and communication
with represented employees, grievance procedures and other conditions of employment.
(b) “Employment relations” does not include subjects  determined to be permissive, nonmanda-
tory subjects of bargaining by the Employment Relations Board prior to June 6, 1995.
(c) After June 6,  1995, “employment relations” does not include subjects that the Employment
Relations Board determines to have a greater  impact on management’s prerogative than on em-
ployee wages, hours, or other terms and conditions of employment.
(d) “Employment relations” does not include subjects that have an insubstantial  or de minimis
effect on public employee wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment.
(e) For school district  bargaining, “employment relations” excludes class size, the school or ed-
ucational calendar, standards of  performance or criteria for evaluation of teachers, the school cur-
riculum, reasonable dress, grooming and at-work personal conduct requirements respecting smoking,
gum chewing and similar matters of personal conduct, the standards and procedures for student
discipline, the time between student  classes, the selection, agendas and decisions of 21st Century
Schools Councils established under ORS 329.704, requirements for expressing milk under  ORS
653.077, and any  other subject proposed that is permissive under paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this
subsection.
(f) For employee bargaining involving employees covered by ORS 243.736 and  employees of the
Department of Corrections who have direct contact with adults in  custody, “employment relations”
includes safety issues  that have an impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees or staffing levels
that have a significant impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees.
[(g) For  employee bargaining involving sworn law enforcement officers of a law enforcement
agency, as those terms  are defined in ORS 131.930, “employment relations” includes the development
of a discipline guide or discipline matrix as those terms are defined in ORS 243.706. ]
[(h)] (g) For all other  employee bargaining except school district bargaining and except as pro-
vided in paragraph (f) of this subsection, “employment relations” excludes staffing levels and safety
issues (except those staffing levels  and safety issues that have a direct and substantial effect on the
on-the-job safety of public employees), scheduling  of services provided to the public, determination
of the minimum qualifications necessary  for any position, criteria for evaluation or performance
appraisal, assignment of duties, workload when the  effect on duties is insubstantial, reasonable
dress, grooming, and at-work personal conduct  requirements respecting smoking, gum chewing, and
similar matters of personal conduct at work, and any  other subject proposed that is permissive un-
der paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(8) “Exclusive representative” means  the labor organization that, as a result of certification by
the board or recognition by the employer, has the right to be the collective bargaining agent of  all
employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 8
(9) “Fact-finding” means identification  of the major issues in a particular labor dispute by one
or more impartial individuals who review the positions  of the parties, resolve factual differences and
make recommendations for settlement of the dispute.
(10) “Fair-share agreement” means an agreement between the public employer  and the recog-
nized or certified  bargaining representative of public employees whereby employees who are not
members of the employee organization are required to make an in-lieu-of-dues payment to  an em-
ployee organization except as provided in ORS 243.666. Upon the filing with the board  of a petition
by 30 percent or more of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit covered by  such union
security agreement declaring they desire  that the agreement be rescinded, the board shall take a
secret ballot of the employees in the unit and certify the results thereof to the  recognized or certi-
fied bargaining representative and to the public employer. Unless  a majority of the votes cast in an
election favor the union security agreement, the board shall certify deauthorization of  the agree-
ment. A petition  for deauthorization of a union security agreement must be filed not more than 90
calendar days after the collective bargaining agreement is  executed. Only one such election may be
conducted in any appropriate bargaining unit  during the term of a collective bargaining agreement
between a public employer and the recognized or certified bargaining representative.
(11) “Final offer”  means the proposed contract language and cost summary submitted to the
mediator within seven days of the declaration of impasse.
(12) “Labor  dispute” means any controversy concerning employment relations or concerning the
association or representation of persons  in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to
arrange terms or conditions of employment relations, regardless of  whether the disputants stand in
the proximate relation of employer and employee.
(13) “Labor  organization” means any organization that has as one of its purposes representing
employees in their employment relations with public employers.
(14) “Last best offer package” means the offer exchanged by parties not  less than 14 days prior
to the date scheduled for an interest arbitration hearing.
(15) “Legislative body” means the Legislative Assembly, the city council, the  county commission
and any other board or commission empowered to levy taxes.
(16) “Managerial employee” means an employee of the State of Oregon or  a public university
listed in ORS 352.002  who possesses authority to formulate and carry out management decisions or
who represents management’s interest by taking or effectively recommending  discretionary actions
that control or implement employer policy, and who has discretion in  the performance of these
management responsibilities beyond the routine discharge of duties.  A “managerial employee” need
not act in a supervisory capacity in relation to other employees. Notwithstanding  this subsection,
“managerial employee” does not include faculty members at a community college, college or uni-
versity.
(17) “Mediation” means assistance by an impartial third  party in reconciling a labor dispute
between the public employer and the exclusive representative regarding employment relations.
(18) “Payment-in-lieu-of-dues” means an assessment to defray the cost for services by  the exclu-
sive representative  in negotiations and contract administration of all persons in an appropriate
bargaining unit who are not members of the organization serving as exclusive  representative of the
employees. The payment must be equivalent to  regular union dues and assessments, if any, or must
be an amount  agreed upon by the public employer and the exclusive representative of the employees.
(19) “Public employee” means  an employee of a public employer but does not include elected
officials, persons appointed to serve on boards or commissions, incarcerated persons working under
Article I, section 41, of  the Oregon Constitution, or persons who are confidential employees, super-
visory employees or managerial employees.
(20) “Public employer”  means the State of Oregon, and the following political subdivisions:
Cities, counties,  community colleges, school districts, special districts, mass transit districts, metro-
politan service districts, public service  corporations or municipal corporations and public and
quasi-public corporations.
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 9
(21) “Public employer representative” includes  any individual or individuals specifically desig-
nated by the public employer to act in its interests in all matters dealing with employee represen-
tation, collective bargaining and related issues.
(22) “Strike” means a public employee’s refusal in concerted action with others to  report for
duty, or  his or her willful absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage of work, or his
or her absence in whole or in part from the full, faithful or  proper performance of his or her duties
of employment, for the purpose of inducing, influencing or  coercing a change in the conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges or obligations of public employment; however, nothing  shall limit
or impair the right  of any public employee to lawfully express or communicate a complaint or
opinion on any matter related to the conditions of employment.
(23)(a) “Supervisory  employee” means any individual having authority in the interest of the
employer to hire, transfer,  suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward or discipline
other employees, or responsibly to direct them, or to adjust their grievances,  or effectively to re-
commend such  action, if in connection therewith, the exercise of the authority is not of a merely
routine or clerical nature but requires the use of independent  judgment. Failure to assert supervi-
sory status in any Employment Relations Board proceeding or in negotiations for any  collective
bargaining agreement does not thereafter prevent assertion of supervisory status  in any subsequent
board proceeding or contract negotiation.
(b) “Supervisory  employee” includes a faculty member of a public university listed in ORS
352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University who:
(A) Is employed as a president, vice president, provost, vice provost, dean, associate  dean, as-
sistant dean, head or equivalent position; or
(B) Is employed  in an administrative position without a reasonable expectation of teaching, re-
search or other scholarly accomplishments.
(c) “Supervisory employee” does not include:
(A) A nurse, charge nurse or nurse holding a similar position if  that position has not tradi-
tionally been classified as supervisory;
(B) A firefighter prohibited from striking by ORS 243.736 who  assigns, transfers or directs the
work of other employees but does not have the  authority to hire, discharge or impose economic
discipline on those employees; or
(C) A faculty  member of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health and
Science University who is not a faculty member described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(24) “Unfair labor  practice” means the commission of an act designated an unfair labor practice
in ORS 243.672.
(25) “Voluntary  arbitration” means the procedure whereby parties involved in a labor dispute
mutually agree to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 243.706, as amended by section 1, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special
session), is amended to read:
243.706. (1) A public employer may enter into a written agreement with the  exclusive represen-
tative of an appropriate bargaining  unit setting forth a grievance procedure culminating in binding
arbitration or any other dispute resolution process agreed to by the parties. As a  condition of
enforceability, any arbitration award that orders the reinstatement of a public employee  or other-
wise relieves the public employee of responsibility for misconduct shall comply with  public policy
requirements as clearly defined in statutes  or judicial decisions including but not limited to policies
respecting sexual harassment or sexual misconduct,  unjustified and egregious use of physical or
deadly force and  serious criminal misconduct, related to work. In addition, with respect to claims
that a grievant should be reinstated  or otherwise relieved of responsibility for misconduct based
upon the public employer’s alleged previous differential  treatment of employees for the same or
similar conduct, the arbitration award must conform to the following principles:
(a) Some misconduct is so egregious that no employee can reasonably rely on past  treatment for
similar offenses as a justification or defense to discharge or other discipline.
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 10
(b) Public managers have a right  to change disciplinary policies at any time, notwithstanding
prior practices, if such  managers give reasonable advance notice to affected employees and the
change does not otherwise violate a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) In addition  to subsection (1) of this section, a public employer may enter into a written
agreement with the exclusive representative of its employees providing that a labor dispute over
conditions and terms of a contract may be resolved through binding arbitration.
(3) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section, when an arbitration proceeding involves al-
leged misconduct by a sworn law enforcement officer of any  law enforcement agency, as those terms
are defined in ORS 131.930, and the arbitrator makes  a finding that misconduct has occurred con-
sistent with  the law enforcement agency’s finding of misconduct  or, if applicable, consistent with
a finding of misconduct by a civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body ,
the arbitration award may not order any disciplinary action that differs from the disciplinary action
imposed by the law enforcement agency or the civilian or community oversight board, agency
or review body, if the disciplinary action imposed by the law enforcement agency , or the civilian
or community oversight board, agency or review body was in accordance with the uniform
standards adopted by the Commission on  Statewide Law Enforcement Standards of Conduct
and Discipline established under section 4 of this 2021 Act  [ is consistent with the provisions of
a discipline guide or  discipline matrix adopted by the agency as a result of collective bargaining and
incorporated into the agency’s disciplinary policies ].
(4) In an arbitration proceeding under  this section, the arbitrators, or a majority of the
arbitrators, may:
(a) Issue subpoenas on their own motion or at the request of a party to the proceeding to:
(A) Compel the attendance of a witness properly served by either party; and
(B) Require from  either party the production of books, papers and documents the arbitrators find
are relevant to the proceeding;
(b) Administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses; and
(c) Adjourn a hearing from day to day, or for a longer time, and from place to place.
(5) The  arbitrators shall promptly provide a copy of a subpoena issued under this section to each
party to the arbitration proceeding.
(6) The  arbitrators issuing a subpoena under this section may rule on objections to the issuance
of the subpoena.
(7) If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued under this section or if a witness refuses
to testify on a matter on which the witness may be  lawfully questioned, the party who requested the
subpoena or seeks the testimony may apply to the arbitrators for an order authorizing the party to
apply to the circuit court of any county to enforce the  subpoena or compel the testimony. On the
application of the attorney of record  for the party or on the application of the arbitrators, or a
majority of the arbitrators, the court may require the person or  witness to show cause why the
person or witness should not be punished for contempt of  court to the same extent and purpose as
if the proceedings were pending before the court.
(8) Witnesses appearing pursuant to subpoena, other than parties or officers or  employees of the
public employer, shall receive fees and mileage as prescribed by law for witnesses  in ORS 44.415 (2).
(9) As used in this section[ :], “civilian or community oversight board,  agency or review
body” means a board, an agency or a body:
(a) Designated by a municipality  or a law enforcement agency in performing duties re-
lated to investigating allegations of officer misconduct or reviewing police policies  and prac-
tices; or
(b) Created to oversee disciplinary matters concerning law enforcement officers pursuant
to a city charter or ordinance for which a measure that included  the question of whether to
establish the board, agency or body was referred to and approved by  the people of the city
at an election held on or after July 1, 2020.
[(a) “Discipline guide” means a grid that is designed to provide parameters for the level of disci-
pline to be imposed for an act  of misconduct that is categorized by the severity of the misconduct and
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 11
that take into account the presumptive level of discipline for the misconduct and any aggravating  or
mitigating factors.]
[(b) “Discipline matrix” means a grid used to determine the level of discipline to be  imposed for
an act of misconduct that is  categorized by the severity of the misconduct, according to the intersection
where the category of misconduct and the level of disciplinary action meet. ]
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police  by section 1 (4), chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5028), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for Administrative Ser-
vices, Agency Support and Criminal Justice Information  Services, is increased by $255,773 for
training expenses related to sections 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 9. Section 2 of this 2021 Act applies to collective bargaining agreements entered
into or renewed on or after July 1, 2021.
SECTION 10. Section 3 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 243.650 and 243.706
by sections 5 to 7 of this 2021  Act apply to collective bargaining agreements entered into or
renewed on or after the operative date specified in section 10 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. Section 3 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 243.650 and 243.706
by sections 5 to 7 of this 2021 Act become operative on  or before November 1, 2022, but not
sooner than 30 days after the date required under section 4 (4) of this 2021 Act for  the
Commission on Statewide Law Enforcement Standards of Conduct and  Discipline to adopt
and publish the rules establishing the uniform standards described under section 4 (1) of  this
2021 Act.
SECTION 12.  This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2930 (HB 2930-B) Page 12